Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5596.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-87 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Prekindergarten
Education Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-87-8. Prekindergarten seat finder.
(a) Purpose. The purpose of this section is to establish a statewide prekindergarten seat
finder to support families in accessing high-quality early childhood education programs for three
(3) and four (4) year old children. This system will provide real-time availability, eligibility
screening, and application support for families seeking licensed early learning providers.
(b) Establishment of a prekindergarten finder platform development.
(1) The department of elementary and secondary education shall procure or develop and
maintain a statewide digital prekindergarten seat finder platform to help families locate and secure
Pre-K program placements.
(2) Functionality. The finder shall include the following:
(i) Provide real-time availability of licensed early learning programs serving three (3) and
four (4) year old children;
(ii) Include a searchable directory of providers with filters for location, hours, quality
ratings, tuition, language, tour availability, parent ratings, and subsidy eligibility;
(iii) Offer an eligibility screener for state and federally funded Pre-K programs; including
Head Start, state preschool, and mixed-delivery models;

(iv) Enable families to apply directly for programs or join waitlists through a centralized
intake system; and
(v) Ensure accessibility for non-English speaking families and those with disabilities.
(c) Provider participation and data requirements.
(1) All licensed Pre-K providers, including state-funded, private, and nonprofit programs,
must participate in the finder platform.
(2) Providers must update availability at least weekly and report key program details,
including:
(i) Enrollment openings by age group;
(ii) Tuition rates and subsidy acceptance;
(iii) Program quality indicators (QRIS ratings, national accreditation status);
(iv) Special services offered including, but not limited to, dual-language, inclusive
education, and extended care;
(v) Parental ratings; and
(vi) Tour availability.
(3) The state shall integrate the finder with the subsidy eligibility system to facilitate
streamlined enrollment for families using childcare assistance or Pre-K grants.
(d) Parental support and outreach. The department shall conduct outreach campaigns to
ensure families, particularly those in underserved communities, are aware of and can access the
finder.
(e) Implementation. The finder shall be fully operational within twelve (12) months of
enactment. The department shall report annually to the speaker of the house and senate president
on usage rates, enrollment trends, and provider participation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001966
========
LC001966 - Page 2 of 3